Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 10

Vendor's Liens

66-10-101. Right to sell land for payment of vendor.

The vendor of land, as each payment of the purchase money becomes due, may bring an action to enforce such vendor's lien as vendor, and may have so much of the land sold as may be necessary to pay the money then due.

Code 1858, § 3563 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 50, § 1); Shan., § 5326; Code 1932, § 8037; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1002.

Cross-References. Limitation of action to enforce lien, §28-2-111.

Priority of lien for improvements, §66-11-109.

Priority over employees' lien, §66-13-101.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 470, 471.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-207.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, §§ 55, 57, 74.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).

66-10-102. Jurisdiction to enforce against land.

The court of chancery has jurisdiction to enforce the vendor's lien when the amount due is fifty dollars ($50.00) and over.

Code 1932, § 8041; Acts 1933, ch. 96, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8041; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1003.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 66.

66-10-103. Successive sales to meet installments.

The suit shall be retained in court, and, as each of the payments becomes due, the court shall direct a sufficient quantity of the land to be sold to satisfy the same.

Code 1858, § 3564 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 50, § 1); Shan., § 5327; Code 1932, § 8038; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1004.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 74.

66-10-104. Sale of land as a whole.

If the land cannot be divided without material injury to the parties, or, if the vendee so direct, the court shall order it all to be sold at one (1) time, making the payments to fall due at such times as the purchaser has agreed to pay the vendor; and the money, as collected, shall be applied to the payment of the installments due the vendor.

Code 1858, § 3565 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 50, § 2); Shan., § 5328; mod. Code 1932, § 8039; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1005.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 74.

66-10-105. Redemption.

Whether the land is all sold, or is sold in parcels, the defendant shall have the right of redemption, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 3566 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 50, § 3); Shan., § 5329; Code 1932, § 8040; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1006.

Cross-References. Redemption, title 66, ch. 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 55.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee and the Installment Land Contract: A Viable Alternative to the Deed of Trust, 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 551 (1991).